Washington statutes.
RCW 26.28.050

Satisfaction of minor's contract for services.

When a contract for the personal services of a minor has been made with him or her alone, and those services are afterwards performed, payment made therefor to such minor in accordance with the terms of the contract, is a full satisfaction for those services, and the parents or guardian cannot recover therefor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 696; 1866 p 93 s 4; RRS s 5831.]